Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2919
Default; investment program; powers.

In the event of a default by a borrower under the Infrastructure Development Investment Program Act, the investment program may pursue any lawful remedy, including acceleration, set-off, intercept of state aid that is otherwise due to the borrower, or transfer of collateral, consistent with constitutional and federal limitations.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 19.
July 18, 2026